Wisconsin, session 2025, AB686.
do enact as follows:AB686,11Section 1. 71.07 (6e) (a) 2. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB686,2,9271.07 (6e) (a) 2. b. An individual who had served on active duty under 3honorable conditions in the U.S. armed forces or in forces incorporated as part of 4the U.S. armed forces; who was a resident of this state at the time of entry into that 5active service or who had been a resident of this state for any consecutive 5-year 6period after entry into that active duty service; who was a resident of this state at 7the time of his or her death; and who had either a service-connected disability 8rating of 100 at least 70 percent under 38 USC 1114 or 1134 or a 100 percent 9disability rating based on individual unemployability.AB686,210Section 2. 71.07 (6e) (a) 3. d. of the statutes is amended to read:AB686,2,131171.07 (6e) (a) 3. d. Has either a service-connected disability rating of 100 at 12least 70 percent under 38 USC 1114 or 1134 or a 100 percent disability rating based 13on individual unemployability.AB686,314Section 3. 71.07 (6e) (c) 4. of the statutes is created to read:AB686,2,181571.07 (6e) (c) 4. If a claimant’s service-connected disability rating is less than 16100 percent, the amount that the claimant may claim under this subsection shall be 17multiplied by a percentage that equals the eligible veteran’s service-connected 18disability rating.AB686,419Section 4. Initial applicability.AB686,3,220(1) This act first applies to taxable years beginning on January 1 of the year in 21which this subsection takes effect, except that if this subsection takes effect after 1July 31 this act first applies to taxable years beginning on January 1 of the year 2following the year in which this subsection takes effect.AB686,3,33